Washington statutes.
RCW 15.24.035

Members—Appointments by director—Meeting to nominate candidates—Advisory ballot.

(1) The director shall appoint the members of the commission.

(2) Except as provided in RCW 15.24.050, before the expiration of a commission member's term, the commission shall call a meeting of apple growers and dealers for the purpose of nominating candidates whose names will be forwarded to the director for consideration for appointment as a member of the commission. The meetings may be held each year, as far as practicable, at the same time and place as an annual meeting of a grower or dealer organization that represents a majority of the state's apple growers or dealers, but not while the same is in actual session. Public notice of such meetings must be given by the commission in such manner as it may determine: PROVIDED, That nonreceipt of the notice by any interested person does not invalidate the proceedings. Any qualified person may be nominated orally for such positions at the respective meetings. Nominations may also be made within five days after any such meeting by written petition filed in the office of the commission, signed by not less than five apple growers or dealers, as the case may be, residing within the district.

(3) The commission shall hold an advisory vote in the event that more than two candidates are nominated for a position. The names of the two candidates receiving the most votes in the advisory vote shall be forwarded to the director for consideration. In the event that only one candidate is nominated, the name must be forwarded to the director for consideration without an advisory vote.

(4) Advisory ballots shall be mailed to all growers for grower positions and to affected dealers for dealer positions. The advisory ballot shall be conducted in a manner so that it is a secret ballot. Nominees to be forwarded to the director for consideration for appointment to dealer positions on the commission shall be selected by a majority of the votes cast by the apple dealers in the respective districts, each dealer being entitled to one vote. Nominees to be forwarded to the director for consideration for appointment to grower positions on the commission shall be selected by a majority of the votes cast by the apple growers in the respective districts. Each grower engaged in the business of producing apples for market in commercial quantities within the district is entitled to one vote. An individual commercial orchard operator, if otherwise qualified, is entitled to vote, even though he or she is also a member of a partnership or corporation, which also is entitled to vote.

(5) The director has the discretion to appoint or reject any candidate.

(6) Any candidate whose name is forwarded to the director for potential appointment shall submit to the director a letter stating why he or she wishes to be appointed to the commission. The director may select any candidate for the position or may reject all candidates and request a new advisory vote with nominees selected by the commission and, if desired, by the director.

[ 2016 sp.s. c 15 s 4; 2008 c 11 s 1; 2004 c 178 s 5.]